Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.015

Pension boards—Members—Terms—Vacancies—Officers—Quorum.

(1) There is hereby created in each fire protection district which qualifies under this chapter, a firefighters' pension board to consist of the following five members, the chairperson of the fire commissioners for said district who shall be chairperson of the board, the county auditor, county treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or retired firefighters elected by secret ballot of the employed and retired firefighters. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the pension board have both the right to elect and the right to be elected under this section. The first members to be elected by the firefighters shall be elected annually for a two-year term. The two firefighter elected members shall, in turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve in the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the firefighter or retired members, the members shall in the same manner elect a successor to serve the unexpired term. The board may select and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be a member of the board. In case of absence or inability of the chairperson to act, the board may select a chairperson pro tempore who shall during such absence or inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the chairperson. A majority of the members of said board shall constitute a quorum and have power to transact business.

(2) If no eligible regularly employed or retired firefighters are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Any active or retired firefighters who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board. This includes active and retired firefighters under this chapter and chapters 41.16, 41.26, and 52.26 RCW;

(b) The widow or widower of a firefighter subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

[ 2020 c 107 s 4; 2007 c 218 s 42; 1992 c 6 s 1; 1961 c 255 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.